Missouri, session 2026, SB1190.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 516.105, RSMo, is repealed and two new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
516.105 and 538.212, to read as follows:
516.105. 1. All actions against physicians,
hospitals, dentists, registered or licensed practical
nurses, optometrists, podiatrists, pharmacists,
chiropractors, professional physical therapists, mental
health professionals licensed under chapter 337, and any
other entity providing health care services and all
employees of any of the foregoing acting in the course and
scope of their employment, for damages for malpractice,
negligence, error or mistake related to health care shall be
brought within two years from the date of occurrence of the
act of neglect complained of, except that:
(1) In cases in which the act of neglect complained of
is introducing and negligently permitting any foreign object
to remain within the body of a living person, the action
shall be brought within two years from the date of the
discovery of such alleged negligence, or from the date on
which the patient in the exercise of ordinary care should
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1190 2
have discovered such alleged negligence, whichever date
first occurs; [and]
(2) In cases in which the act of neglect complained of
is the negligent failure to inform the patient of the
results of medical tests, the action for failure to inform
shall be brought within two years from the date of the
discovery of such alleged negligent failure to inform, or
from the date on which the patient in the exercise of
ordinary care should have discovered such alleged negligent
failure to inform, whichever date first occurs; except that,
no such action shall be brought for any negligent failure to
inform about the results of medical tests performed more
than two years before August 28, 1999. For purposes of this
subdivision, the act of neglect based on the negligent
failure to inform the patient of the results of medical
tests shall not include the act of informing the patient of
the results of negligently performed medical tests or the
act of informing the patient of erroneous test results; [and]
(3) In cases in which the person bringing the action
is a minor less than eighteen years of age, such minor shall
have until his or her twentieth birthday to bring such
action; and
(4) In cases in which the act of neglect complained of
is related to the provision of a gender transition surgery
or other gender transition services or in the course of
prescribing or administering cross-sex hormones or puberty-
blocking drugs, the action shall be brought within fifteen
years from the date of discovery of the injury and of the
causal relationship between the injury and the provision of
a gender transition surgery or other gender transition
services or in the course of prescribing or administering
cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs. As used in

SB 1190 3
this subdivision, the terms "gender transition", "gender
transition services", "cross-sex hormones", and "puberty
blocking drugs" shall have the same meaning as such terms in
section 191.1720.
Except for those actions provided in subdivision (4) of this
subsection, in no event shall any action for damages for
malpractice, error, or mistake be commenced after the
expiration of ten years from the date of the act of neglect
complained of or for two years from a minor's eighteenth
birthday, whichever is later.
2. Any service on a defendant by a plaintiff after the
statute of limitations set forth in subsection 1 of this
section has expired or after the expiration of any extension
of the time provided to commence an action pursuant to law
shall be made within one hundred eighty days of the filing
of the petition. If such service is not made on a defendant
within one hundred eighty days of the filing of the
petition, the court shall dismiss the action against the
defendant. The dismissal shall be without prejudice unless
the plaintiff has previously taken or suffered a nonsuit, in
which case the dismissal shall be with prejudice.
538.212. 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter to the contrary, there shall be a statutory
cause of action for damages against a health care provider
for personal injury or death arising out of the rendering or
failure to render health care services while in the course
of performing a gender transition surgery or other gender
transition services or in the course of prescribing or
administering cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking drugs.
This section shall replace any such common law cause of

SB 1190 4
action and actions covered by section 538.210 that are filed
after August 28, 2026.
2. The limitation on damages provided in section
538.210 shall not apply to actions brought pursuant to
subsection 1 of this section. In any action against a
health care provider for damages pursuant to subsection 1 of
this section, a prevailing plaintiff may recover economic
and noneconomic damages and punitive damages, without
limitation to the amount, but shall not recover less than
five hundred thousand dollars in the aggregate. The
judgment against a defendant in an action brought pursuant
to this section shall be in an amount of three times the
amount of any economic and noneconomic damages or punitive
damages assessed. Any award of damages in an action brought
pursuant to this subsection to a prevailing plaintiff shall
include attorney's fees and court costs.
3. Any purported waiver of liability by an injured
party for the provision of services or for the failure to
perform services related to a gender transition surgery or
other gender transition services or in the prescription or
administration of cross-sex hormones or puberty-blocking
drugs by a health care provider shall be void and
unenforceable.
4. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Biological sex", the biological indication of
male or female in the context of reproductive potential or
capacity, such as sex chromosomes, naturally occurring sex
hormones, gonads, and nonambiguous internal and external
genitalia present at birth, without regard to an
individual's psychological, chosen, or subjective experience
of gender;

SB 1190 5
(2) "Cross-sex hormones", testosterone, estrogen, or
other androgens given to an individual in amounts that are
greater or more potent than would normally occur naturally
in a healthy individual of the same age and sex;
(3) "Gender", the psychological, behavioral, social,
and cultural aspects of being male or female;
(4) "Gender transition", the process in which an
individual transitions from identifying with and living as a
gender that corresponds to his or her biological sex to
identifying with and living as a gender different from his
or her biological sex, and may involve social, legal, or
physical changes;
(5) "Gender transition surgery", a surgical procedure
performed for the purpose of assisting an individual with a
gender transition, including, but not limited to:
(a) Surgical procedures that sterilize, including, but
not limited to, castration, vasectomy, hysterectomy,
oophorectomy, orchiectomy, or penectomy;
(b) Surgical procedures that artificially construct
tissue with the appearance of genitalia that differs from
the individual's biological sex, including, but not limited
to, metoidioplasty, phalloplasty, or vaginoplasty; or
(c) Augmentation mammoplasty or subcutaneous
mastectomy;
(6) "Puberty-blocking drugs", gonadotropin-releasing
hormone analogues or other synthetic drugs used to stop
luteinizing hormone secretion and follicle stimulating
hormone secretion, synthetic antiandrogen drugs to block the
androgen receptor, or any other drug used to delay or
suppress pubertal development in children for the purpose of
assisting an individual with a gender transition.
✓